Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-804
Limitation on liability.

No cause of action shall
lie in any court against any wireless carrier or its officers, employees,
agents, or assigns for providing call location information while acting at
the request of a law enforcement agency in accordance with the provisions
of the Kelsey Smith Act. All wireless carriers shall be held harmless from
any and all claims, damages, costs, and expenses, including attorney's fees,
arising from or related to the release of call location information while
acting at the request of a law enforcement agency.

Laws 2010, LB735, § 4.